Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.345.115

School director governance—Cultural competency, diversity, equity, and inclusion—Report.

(1) The Washington state school directors' association shall:

(a) Develop cultural competency, diversity, equity, and inclusion standards for school director governance;

(b) Collaborate with the Washington professional educator standards board to compare and align the standards for school director governance developed under (a) of this subsection with the standards of practice developed under RCW 28A.410.260. The review must include the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee and may include the office of equity established under RCW 43.06D.020; and

(c) Maintain the final cultural competency, diversity, equity, and inclusion standards for school director governance on its website at no cost to school districts.

(2) By November 1, 2030, and every 10 years thereafter, the Washington state school directors' association shall review the definitions in RCW 28A.415.443 and the cultural competency, diversity, equity, and inclusion standards for school director governance developed under subsection (1) of this section and report, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, to the appropriate committees of the legislature with any recommendations for revising the definitions in RCW 28A.415.443.

(3) For purposes of this section, "cultural competency," "diversity," "equity," and "inclusion" have the same meaning as in RCW 28A.415.443.

[ 2021 c 197 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 197: See note following RCW 28A.415.443.